Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.141

Public records exemptions accountability committee—Wolf depredation information exemption. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

By December 1, 2021, the public records exemptions accountability committee, in addition to its duties in RCW 42.56.140, must prepare and submit a report to the legislature that includes recommendations on whether the exemptions created in section 1, chapter 246, Laws of 2017 should be continued or allowed to expire. The report should focus on whether the exemption continues to serve the intent of the legislature in section 1, chapter 246, Laws of 2017 to provide protections of personal information during the period the state establishes and implements new policies regarding wolf management. The committee must consider whether the development of wolf management policy, by the time of the report, has diminished risks of threats to personal safety so that the protection of personal information in section 1, chapter 246, Laws of 2017 is no longer an ongoing necessity.

[ 2017 c 246 s 3.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2017 c 246: See note following RCW 42.56.430.